Utah statutes.
20A-6-105.5.   Voter access to provisional ballot information.
Each county clerk shall implement, through an internet website, toll-free
telephone number, or other means, a system where an individual who voted a
provisional ballot may, free of charge, determine if the voter's vote was
counted, and, if the vote was not counted, the reason the vote was not
counted.
